Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,216
Transfer of authority.

(MBCA 15.23) (a) A foreign
business corporation authorized to transact business in this state that converts
to a foreign nonprofit corporation or to any form of foreign unincorporated
entity that is required to obtain a certificate of authority or make a similar
type of filing with the Secretary of State if it transacts business in this
state shall file with the Secretary of State an application for transfer of
authority signed by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The
application shall set forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The type of unincorporated
entity to which it has been converted and the jurisdiction whose laws govern
its internal affairs; and

(3)
Any other information that would be required in a filing under the laws of
this state by an unincorporated entity of the type the corporation has become
seeking authority to transact business in this state.

(b) The application for transfer of
authority shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing and shall
take effect at the effective time provided in section 21-206.

(c) Upon the effectiveness
of the application for transfer of authority, the authority of the corporation
under sections 21-2,203 to 21-2,220 to transact business in this state shall
be transferred without interruption to the converted entity which shall thereafter
hold such authority subject to the provisions of the laws of this state applicable
to that type of unincorporated entity.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 216.